Montana, session 2025, HB533.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Wildfire risk score in underwriting RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY EVALUATION OR IN RATING. (1)
An insurer that uses a wildfire risk score in connection with the underwriting property evaluation or in rating of
residential real property shall, on the request of an insured, the insured's insurance producer, or an applicant for
residential property insurance coverage for the wildfire risk score, provide the following information to the
insured or the applicant to enhance transparency:
(a) the current wildfire risk score of the residential property;
(b) the range of possible wildfire risk scores under the model used;
(c) the name of the person or entity that created the wildfire risk score;
(d) the date on which the wildfire risk score was created; and
(e) the key factors that adversely affected the wildfire risk score of the residential property.
(2) An insurer shall provide to a property owner in writing the information referred to in subsection
(1) by no later than 15 30 days after receiving a request for the information.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) (i) "Insurer" means admitted insurers in this state.
(ii) The term does not apply to nonadmitted insurers.
(b) "Wildfire risk score” means a numerical value, rating, or categorization derived from a statistical
tool, modeling system, algorithm, or other process that is used for the purpose of predicting the future wildfire-
related insurance loss exposure of a property to measure or assess wildfire risk for a residential property for the
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 533
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 533
purposes of property evaluation in rating.
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
33, chapter 16, and the provisions of Title 33, chapter 16, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 533
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 533, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 533
INTRODUCED BY C. SCHOMER
AN ACT REQUIRING INSURERS THAT USE A WILDFIRE RISK SCORE TO PROVIDE THE REQUESTER
WITH CERTAIN INFORMATION TO ENHANCE TRANSPARENCY; PROVIDING TIMELINES FOR THE
INSURER TO RESPOND; AND PROVIDING DEFINITIONS.”